North Carolina, session 2025, HB543.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 9 of Chapter 78C of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 78C-89.1. Criminal history record check.
(a) All applicants for registration or renewal of registration as an athlete agent in this
State shall consent to a criminal history record check. Refusal to consent to a criminal history
record check may constitute grounds for the Secretary of State to deny a certificate of registration
to an applicant. The Board shall provide to the State Bureau of Investigation the fingerprints of
the applicant to be checked, a form signed by the applicant consenting to the criminal history
record check and the use of fingerprints and other identifying information required by the State
or National Repositories, and any additional information required by the State Bureau of
Investigation. The Board shall keep all information obtained pursuant to this section confidential.
(b) The cost of the criminal history record check and the fingerprinting shall be paid by
the applicant. The Secretary of State shall collect any fees required by the State Bureau of
Investigation and shall remit the fees to the State Bureau of Investigation for expenses associated
with conducting the criminal history record check."
SECTION 2. G.S. 78C-93 reads as rewritten:
"§ 78C-93. Registration; renewal of fees.
An application for registration or renewal of registration must be accompanied by a fee in the
following amount:
(1) Application for registration ..................................................... $200.00$250.00
(2) Application for registration based upon a certificate of
registration or licensure issued by another state ......................... 200.00250.00
(3) Application for renewal of registration ....................................... 200.00250.00
(4) Application for renewal of registration based upon an
application for renewal of registration or licensure
submitted in another state........................................................ 200.00.250.00."
SECTION 3. G.S. 143B-1209.57 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143B-1209.57. Criminal record check for platform licensees.checks for the Secretary of
State.
*H543-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The State Bureau of Investigation may provide to the Secretary of State a criminal
history from the State and National Repositories of Criminal Histories for any applicant seeking
a certificate of registration as an athlete agent or a platform license. The Secretary shall provide
to the Bureau, along with the request, the fingerprints of the applicant and its key persons; a form
signed by the individual consenting to the criminal record check and use of fingerprints and other
identifying information required by the State and National Repositories; and any additional
information required by the Bureau. The fingerprints of the individual shall be used for a search
of the State's criminal history record file, and the Bureau shall forward a set of fingerprints to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.
(b) The criminal history report shall be provided to the Secretary of State, who shall keep
all information obtained pursuant to this section confidential to the Secretary of State. A criminal
history report obtained as provided in this section is not a public record under Chapter 132 of the
General Statutes."
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to applications
for registration or renewal received on or after that date.
Page 2 House Bill 543-First Edition